Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB65.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1535(a) and 3345(a) and (j) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 1535(A) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 1535. Schedule of convictions and points.(a) General rule.--A point system for driver education and control is hereby established which is related to other provisions for use, suspension and revocation of the operating privilege as specified under this title. Every driver licensed in this Commonwealth who is convicted of any of the following offenses shall be assessed points as of the date of violation in accordance with the following schedule:<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 Section Number Offense Points1512 Violation of restriction on driver's license. 21571 Violation concerning license. 33102 Failure to obey policeman or authorized person. 23111.1 Obedience to traffic-control devices warning of hazardous conditions. 23112(a)(3)(i) or (ii)Failure to stop for a red light. 33114(a)(1) Failure to stop for a flashing red light. 33302 Failure to yield half of roadway to oncoming vehicle. 33303 Improper passing. 33304 Other improper passing. 33305 Other improper passing. 33306(a)(1) Other improper passing. 43306(a)(2) Other improper passing. 33306(a)(3) Other improper passing. 33307 Other improper passing. 33310 Following too closely. 33321 Failure to yield to driver on the right at intersection. 33322 Failure to yield to oncoming driver when making left turn. 33323(b) Failure to stop for stop sign. 33323(c) Failure to yield at yield sign. 320250SB0065PN0486 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 3324 Failure to yield when entering or crossing roadway between intersections. 33327(a) or (a.1)Duty of driver in emergency response area and in relation to disabled vehicles. 23332 Improper turning around. 33341(a) Failure to obey signal indicating approach of train. 23341(b) Failure to comply with crossing gate or barrier. 4 (and 30 days' suspension)3342(b) or (e) Failure to stop at railroad crossings. 43344 Failure to stop when entering from alley, driveway or building. 33345(a) Failure to stop for school bus with flashing red lights. 5(and 60 days' suspension)3345(b) Failure to proceed past school bus with caution and prepare to stop when amber signal lights are flashing. 23345(f.1) Failure to stop for school bus for transportation of disabled persons.As provided under section 3345(a).3361 Driving too fast for conditions. 220250SB0065PN0486 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 3362 Exceeding maximum speed.--Over Limit: 6-10 2 11-15 3 16-25 4 26-30 5 31-over 5 (and departmental hearing and sanctions provided under section 1538(d))3365(b) Exceeding special speed limit in school zone. 3 (and 60 days' suspension for a second or subsequent offense)3365(c) Exceeding special speed limit for trucks on downgrades. 33542(a) Failure to yield to pedestrian in crosswalk. 23547 Failure to yield to pedestrian on sidewalk. 33549(a) Failure to yield to blind pedestrian. 33702 Improper backing. 33714(a) Careless driving. 33745 Leaving scene of accident involving property damage only. 4* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 3345(A) AND (J) OF TITLE 75 ARE AMENDED 20250SB0065PN0486 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:§ 3345. Meeting or overtaking school bus.(a) Duty of approaching driver when red signals are flashing.--Except as provided in subsection (g), the driver of a vehicle meeting or overtaking any school bus stopped on a highway or trafficway shall stop at least [ten] 15 feet before reaching the school bus when the red signal lights on the school bus are flashing and the side stop signal arms are activated under section 4552(b.1) (relating to general requirements for school buses). The driver shall not proceed until the flashing red signal lights are no longer actuated. In no event shall a driver of a vehicle resume motion of the vehicle until the school children who may have alighted from the school bus have reached a place of safety. The driver of a vehicle approaching an intersection at which a school bus is stopped shall stop his vehicle at that intersection until the flashing red signal lights are no longer actuated.* * *(j) [Penalty] Penalties.--(1) A person who violates subsection (a) or (f.1) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of no less than $250 and no more than $500 and a $35 surcharge. For a second or subsequent offense under this paragraph, the person commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of no less than $500 and a $35 surcharge and attend a driver improvement school or undergo a special examination. The surcharge shall be deposited into the School Bus Safety Grant Program Account.(2) A person who violates subsection (b) commits a 20250SB0065PN0486 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of no less than $100 and a $35 surcharge. For a second or subsequent offense under this paragraph, the person commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of no less than $250 and a $35 surcharge and attend a driver improvement school or undergo a special examination. The surcharge shall be deposited into the School Bus Safety Grant Program Account.(K) DRIVER EDUCATION.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE AN EDUCATIONAL DOCUMENT ON THIS SECTION AND SECTION 3345.1 IN THE RENEWAL NOTICE FOR A DRIVER'S LICENSE. AT A MINIMUM, THE EDUCATIONAL DOCUMENT SHALL COVER A DRIVER'S DUTY WHEN APPROACHING A SCHOOL BUS USING AMBER AND RED SIGNALS FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING OR DISCHARGING SCHOOL CHILDREN AND PENALTIES RELATED TO VIOLATING THIS SECTION OR SECTION 3345.1. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE EDUCATIONAL DOCUMENT AND ANY OTHER EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION BY JULY 31 OF EVERY YEAR AND THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL DULY NOTIFY ALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH OF THIS EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION FOR PURPOSES UNDER SUBSECTION (L).(L) OPTIONAL DRIVER EDUCATION.--A SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY PROVIDE EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT, EITHER WRITTEN, ELECTRONIC OR BOTH, ON THIS SECTION AND SECTION 3345.1, IF APPLICABLE, PRIOR TO AND THROUGHOUT THE SCHOOL YEAR. AT A MINIMUM, THE EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION SHALL COVER A DRIVER'S DUTY WHEN APPROACHING A SCHOOL BUS USING AMBER AND RED SIGNALS FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING OR DISCHARGING SCHOOL CHILDREN AND PENALTIES RELATED TO VIOLATING THIS SECTION OR SECTION 3345.1, IF APPLICABLE.20250SB0065PN0486 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF 75 PA.C.S. § 3345(K) AND (L) SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.(2) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN ONE YEAR.20250SB0065PN0486 - 7 - <--1234567